Nebraska, session 109, LB1179.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 2-409, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-409 (1) The department shall provide technical and legal
assistance in the formation of a producer learning community comprised of
active agricultural producers, landowners, and others who have an
interest in soil health and water quality. The department shall assist
the producer learning community in building awareness and knowledge
relating to soil health and water quality to guide agricultural producers
and landowners in making informed decisions in order to bring about a
more rapid and widespread adoption of best management practices. The
department shall hire a facilitator to lead a collaborative effort to
organize the producer learning community and assist the producer learning
community in acquiring gifts, grants, and sponsorships. The department
shall authorize the facilitator to serve as an ex officio member of the
producer learning community and may locate the facilitator outside of the
city of Lincoln.
(2) The department may partner or contract with any entity or
entities that have resources that would assist in the formation of the
producer learning community, including, but not limited to, the
University of Nebraska and any association of natural resources
districts. The department may also collaborate with the Corn Development,
Utilization, and Marketing Board, the Soybean Development, Utilization,
and Marketing Board, the Grain Sorghum Development, Utilization, and
Marketing Board, the Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and
Marketing Board, and any private farm and ranch associations or
membership organization.
(3) Because of the state's diversity of soils, topography, rainfall,
cropping systems, and other environmental factors, one set of healthy
soil management practices will not fit the entire state and such
practices will differ by region. The department shall divide the state
into different regions in which to establish demonstration and research
-2-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
farms that are representative of each region's particular agricultural
diversity. In establishing such regions, the department may use the land
management areas of the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the
United States Department of Agriculture, the state's natural resources
district boundaries, and the Nebraska Extension Engagement Zones of the
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources as
guidance in establishing boundaries. The department may enter into lease
agreements with private landowners for the purpose of establishing
demonstration and research farms.
(4) Beginning in 2022 and through 2027, the department shall submit
an annual report on or before December 31 to the Governor and
electronically to the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature and the
Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature to report on the status
and progress of implementing the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act
and any impacts and accomplishments made in protecting and improving soil
and water quality across the state.
Sec. 2. Section 2-3226.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-3226.01 (1) In order to implement its duties and obligations under
the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act and in addition
to other powers authorized by law, the board of a district with
jurisdiction that is part of a river basin for which the district has, in
accordance with section 46-715, adopted an integrated management plan
which references section 2-3226.04 and explicitly states its intent in
the plan to utilize qualified projects described in section 2-3226.04 may
issue negotiable bonds and refunding bonds of the district and entitled
river-flow enhancement bonds, with terms determined appropriate by the
board, payable by (a) funds granted to such district by the state or
federal government for one or more qualified projects, (b) the occupation
tax authorized by section 2-3226.05, or (c) the levy authorized by
section 2-3225. The district may issue the bonds or refunding bonds
-3-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
directly, or such bonds may be issued by any joint entity as defined in
section 13-803 whose member public agencies consist only of qualified
natural resources districts or by any joint public agency as defined in
section 13-2503 whose participating public agencies consist only of
qualified natural resources districts, in connection with any joint
project which is to be owned, operated, or financed by the joint entity
or joint public agency for the benefit of its member natural resources
districts. For the payment of such bonds or refunding bonds, the district
may pledge one or more permitted payment sources.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of a written request by the
Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature, the
qualified natural resources districts shall submit an electronic report
to the committee containing an explanation of existing or planned
activities for river-flow enhancement, the revenue source for
implementing such activities, and a description of the estimated benefit
or benefits to the district or districts.
(3) If a district uses the proceeds of a bond issued pursuant to
this section for the purposes described in subdivision (1) of section
2-3226.04 or the state uses funds for those same purposes, the agreement
to acquire water rights by purchase or lease pursuant to such subdivision
shall identify (a) the method of payment, (b) the distribution of funds
by the party or parties receiving payments, (c) the water use or rights
subject to the agreement, and (d) the water use or rights allowed by the
agreement. If any irrigation district is party to the agreement, the
irrigation district shall allocate funds received under such agreement
among its users or members in a reasonable manner, giving consideration
to the benefits received and the value of the rights surrendered for the
specified contract period.
Sec. 3. Section 2-3414, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-3414 The director shall request a hearing by the Legislature's
-4-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
Committee on Agriculture and Natural Resources when petitioned by either
fifteen percent of the egg or turkey producers or any number of producers
representing thirty percent of the eggs or turkeys upon which fees are
being collected to determine whether or not there is need to amend or
repeal sections 2-3401 to 2-3416.
Sec. 4. Section 2-3615, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-3615 (1) The membership districts are as follows:
(a) District 1. The counties of Butler, Saunders, Douglas, Sarpy,
Seward, Lancaster, Cass, Otoe, Saline, Jefferson, Gage, Johnson, Nemaha,
Pawnee, and Richardson;
(b) District 2. The counties of Adams, Clay, Fillmore, Franklin,
Webster, Nuckolls, and Thayer;
(c) District 3. The counties of Merrick, Polk, Hamilton, and York;
(d) District 4. The counties of Knox, Cedar, Dixon, Dakota, Pierce,
Wayne, Thurston, Madison, Stanton, Cuming, Burt, Colfax, Dodge, and
Washington;
(e) District 5. The counties of Sherman, Howard, Dawson, Buffalo,
and Hall;
(f) District 6. The counties of Hayes, Frontier, Gosper, Phelps,
Kearney, Hitchcock, Red Willow, Furnas, and Harlan;
(g) District 7. The counties of Boyd, Holt, Antelope, Garfield,
Wheeler, Boone, Platte, Valley, Greeley, and Nance; and
(h) District 8. The counties of Sioux, Dawes, Box Butte, Sheridan,
Scotts Bluff, Banner, Kimball, Morrill, Cheyenne, Garden, Deuel, Cherry,
Keya Paha, Brown, Rock, Grant, Hooker, Thomas, Blaine, Loup, Arthur,
McPherson, Logan, Custer, Keith, Lincoln, Perkins, Chase, and Dundy.
(2) The board may provide recommendations to the Agriculture and
Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature for potential changes to
the list of counties that make up each membership district.
Sec. 5. Section 37-431, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-5-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
amended to read:
37-431 (1)(a) The Nebraska Habitat Fund is created. The commission
shall remit fees received for annual and multiple-year habitat stamps and
annual and multiple-year Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Habitat Fund. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Up to twenty-five percent of the annual
receipts of the fund may be spent by the commission to provide access to
private wildlife lands and habitat areas, and the remainder of the fund
shall not be spent until the commission has presented a habitat plan to
the Committee on Appropriations of the Legislature for its approval.
(b) Fees received for lifetime habitat stamps and lifetime Nebraska
migratory waterfowl stamps under the Game Law shall be credited to the
Nebraska Habitat Fund. Twenty-five percent of the fees for such stamps
shall not be expended but may be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Income from such investments may be expended by the
commission pursuant to section 37-432.
(2)(a) The Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund is created. The commission
shall remit fees received for annual and multiple-year aquatic habitat
stamps and one dollar of the one-day fishing permit fee as provided in
section 37-426 to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Aquatic
Habitat Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Up to thirty
percent of the annual receipts of the fund may be spent by the commission
to provide public waters angler access enhancements and to provide
funding for the administration of programs related to aquatic habitat and
public waters angler access enhancements, and the remainder of the fund
shall not be spent until the commission has presented a habitat plan to
-6-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
the Committee on Appropriations and the Committee on Agriculture and
Natural Resources of the Legislature for their approval.
(b) Fees received for lifetime aquatic habitat stamps shall be
credited to the Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund and shall not be expended
but may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. Income from such investments may be expended by the commission
pursuant to section 37-432.
(3) The secretary of the commission and any county clerk or public
official designated to sell habitat stamps, aquatic habitat stamps, or
Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps shall be liable upon their official
bonds or equivalent commercial insurance policy for failure to remit the
money from the sale of the stamps, as required by sections 37-426 to
37-433, coming into their hands. Any agent who receives stamp fees and
who fails to remit the fees to the commission within a reasonable time
after demand by the commission shall be liable to the commission in
damages for double the amount of the funds wrongfully withheld. Any agent
who purposefully fails to remit such fees with the intention of
converting them is guilty of theft. The penalty for such violation shall
be determined by the amount converted as specified in section 28-518.
Sec. 6. Section 37-1406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-1406 (1) The adaptive management plan required under section
37-1404 shall be updated at least once every three years following its
initial development. The plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the
Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The plan
submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The Nebraska Invasive Species Council shall submit an annual
report of its activities to the Governor and the Agriculture and Natural
Resources Committee of the Legislature by December 15 of each year. The
annual report shall include an evaluation of progress made in the
-7-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
preceding year. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted
electronically.
(3) The council shall complete the initial adaptive management plan
within three years after April 6, 2012.
(4) Prior to the start of the 2015 legislative session, the council
shall submit electronically a report to the Agriculture and Natural
Resources Committee of the Legislature that makes recommendations as to
the extension or modification of the council.
(5) The council may establish advisory and technical subcommittees
that the council considers necessary to aid and advise it in the
performance of its functions.
Sec. 7. Section 39-2825, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
39-2825 (1) A public-private partnership delivery method may be used
for projects under the Transportation Innovation Act as provided in this
section and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to
this section only to the extent allowed under the Constitution of
Nebraska. State contracts using this method shall be awarded by
competitive negotiation.
(2) A contracting agency utilizing a public-private partnership
shall continue to be responsible for oversight of any function that is
delegated to or otherwise performed by a private partner.
(3) On or before July 1, 2023, the Director-State Engineer shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting forth criteria to be
used in determining when a public-private partnership is to be used for a
particular project. The rules and regulations shall reflect the intent of
the Legislature to promote and encourage the use of public-private
partnerships in the State of Nebraska. The Director-State Engineer shall
consult with design-builders, progressive design-builders, construction
managers, other contractors and design professionals, including engineers
and architects, and other appropriate professionals during the
-8-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
development of the rules and regulations.
(4) A request for proposals for a project utilizing a public-private
partnership shall include at a minimum:
(a) The parameters of the proposed public-private partnership
agreement;
(b) The duties and responsibilities to be performed by the private
partner or private partners;
(c) The methods of oversight to be employed by the contracting
agency;
(d) The duties and responsibilities that are to be performed by the
contracting agency and any other parties to the contract;
(e) The evaluation factors and the relative weight of each factor to
be used in the scoring of awards;
(f) Plans for financing and operating the project and the revenues,
service payments, bond financings, and appropriations of public funds
needed for the qualifying project;
(g) Comprehensive documentation of the experience, capabilities,
capitalization and financial condition, and other relevant qualifications
of the private entity submitting the proposal;
(h) The ability of a private partner or private partners to quickly
respond to the needs presented in the request for proposals and the
importance of economic development opportunities represented by the
project. In evaluating proposals, preference shall be given to a plan
that includes the involvement of small businesses as subcontractors, to
the extent that small businesses can provide services in a competitive
manner, unless any preference interferes with the qualification for
federal or other funds; and
(i) Other information required by the contracting agency to evaluate
the proposals submitted and the overall proposed public-private
partnership.
(5) A private entity desiring to be a private partner shall
-9-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the contracting agency that it is
capable of performing any duty, responsibility, or function it may be
authorized or directed to perform as a term or condition of the public-
private partnership agreement.
(6) A request for proposals may be canceled, or all proposals may be
rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is taken in the
best interest of the State of Nebraska and approved by the purchasing
officer.
(7) Upon execution of a public-private partnership agreement, the
contracting agency shall ensure that the contract clearly identifies that
a public-private partnership is being utilized.
(8) The department shall:
(a) Adhere to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
under this section when utilizing a public-private partnership for
financing capital projects; and
(b) Electronically report annually to the Appropriations Committee
of the Legislature and the Transportation and Telecommunications
Committee of the Legislature regarding private-public partnerships which
have been considered or are approved pursuant to this section.
Sec. 8. Section 46-1304, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
46-1304 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall
prepare a report outlining the extent of ground water quality monitoring
conducted by natural resources districts during the preceding calendar
year. The department shall analyze the data collected for the purpose of
determining whether or not ground water quality is degrading or improving
and shall present the results electronically to the Agriculture and
Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature beginning December 1,
2001, and each year thereafter. The districts shall submit in a timely
manner all ground water quality monitoring data collected to the
department or its designee. The department shall use the data submitted
-10-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
by the districts in conjunction with all other readily available and
compatible data for the purposes of the annual ground water quality trend
analysis.
Sec. 9. Section 46-1305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1305 Each natural resources district shall submit electronically
an annual report to the Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of
the Legislature detailing all water quality programs conducted by the
district in the preceding calendar year. The report shall include the
funds received and expended for water quality projects and a listing of
any unfunded projects. The first report shall be submitted on or before
December 1, 2001, and then each December 1 thereafter.
Sec. 10. Section 50-447, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-447 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to support and
facilitate a study by the Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of
the Legislature to identify policy instruments available to the
Legislature and the people of Nebraska, including, as appropriate, but
not necessarily requiring or limited to, modification of Article XII,
section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska, in order to foster and
enhance legal, social, and economic conditions in Nebraska consistent
with and which advance those state interests that exist in the structure,
development, and progress of agricultural production.
(2) Within the limits of funds appropriated for such purpose, the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council may, in coordination and
cooperation with the Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of the
Legislature, commission experts in the fields of agricultural economics,
agricultural law, commerce clause jurisprudence, and other areas of study
and practice to provide assistance, specific research or reports, or
presentations in order to assist the Agriculture and Natural Resources
Committee of the Legislature in carrying out the intent of the
-11-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
Legislature under this section.
Sec. 11. Section 50-448, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-448 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Attorney
General perform, acquire, and otherwise cause to be made available such
research as may be appropriate to inform and assist the Agriculture and
Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature in identifying policy
instruments available to the Legislature and the people of Nebraska,
including, as appropriate, but not necessarily requiring or limited to,
modification of Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska,
in order to foster and enhance legal, social, and economic conditions in
Nebraska consistent with and which advance those state interests that
exist in the structure, development, and progress of agricultural
production in Nebraska.
(2) The Attorney General may contract with experts in the fields of
agricultural economics, agricultural law, commerce clause jurisprudence,
and other areas of study and practice to assist the Attorney General in
carrying out the intent of the Legislature under this section.
Sec. 12. Section 50-1601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-1601 (1) The Infrastructure Review Task Force is created.
(2) The task force shall:
(a) Review and analyze Nebraska's transportation infrastructure
network;
(b) Examine and consider Nebraska's historic transportation
infrastructure development efforts and expected future transportation
infrastructure needs;
(c) Utilize information and research available from the annual
report on the needs of the state highway system prepared by the
Department of Transportation and any other information or resources
available to the department;
-12-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(d) Examine the status and condition of Nebraska's transportation
infrastructure with consideration given to highway safety concerns and
make recommendations as to how Nebraska might maintain and ensure safe
transportation infrastructure now and in the future;
(e) Consider transportation through the lens of its economic impact
on Nebraska; and
(f) Research any federal funding that may be available to Nebraska
and make recommendations as to how Nebraska might obtain and use such
funds.
(3)(a) The task force consists of the following members:
(i) The Governor;
(ii) A designee of the Governor;
(iii) The chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature;
(iv) The chairperson of the Transportation and Telecommunications
Committee of the Legislature;
(v) The Speaker of the Legislature;
(vi) The Director-State Engineer;
(vii) The Tax Commissioner; and
(viii) Three members of the Legislature appointed by the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council.
(b) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislature
shall be nonvoting, ex officio members.
(4) The chairperson of the task force shall be the chairperson of
the Revenue Committee of the Legislature. Any staff support needed for
the task force shall be fulfilled by the staff of the Revenue Committee
of the Legislature.
(5) The members of the task force shall serve on the task force
without compensation.
(6) On or before December 1 of each year, the task force shall
submit a report containing the results of its work study and its
recommendations, if any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to
-13-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
carry out its recommendations. The reports shall be submitted
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature.
Sec. 13. Section 54-642, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-642 On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall
submit electronically a report to the Legislature in sufficient detail to
document all costs incurred in the previous fiscal year in carrying out
the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act. The report shall
identify costs incurred by the department to administer the act and shall
detail costs incurred by primary activity. The department shall also
provide a breakdown by category of all revenue credited to the Commercial
Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Program Cash Fund in the previous fiscal
year. The Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee and Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature shall review the report to ascertain program
activity levels and to determine funding requirements of the program.
Sec. 14. Section 61-227, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
61-227 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall
convene a plan development group which shall be housed and staffed for
administrative purposes within such department. The Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment shall engage with federal, state, and local
agency and community stakeholders in the development of the state flood
mitigation plan, including, but not limited to, the Department of
Transportation, the Department of Economic Development, the Department of
Agriculture, the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency, natural resources
districts, the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States
Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Federal
Emergency Management Agency, the University of Nebraska, representatives
of counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, and the
Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may engage other sources to
-14-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
provide technical expertise as needed.
Sec. 15. Section 61-520, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
61-520 (1) A public-private partnership delivery method may be used
for projects under the Public Water and Natural Resources Project
Contracting Act as provided in this section and rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section only to the extent
allowed under the Constitution of Nebraska. State contracts using this
method shall be awarded by competitive negotiation.
(2) The department utilizing a public-private partnership shall
continue to be responsible for oversight of any function that is
delegated to or otherwise performed by a private partner.
(3) On or before July 1, 2024, the Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting
forth criteria to be used in determining when a public-private
partnership is to be used for a particular project. The rules and
regulations shall reflect the intent of the Legislature to promote and
encourage the use of public-private partnerships in the State of
Nebraska. The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment shall consult
with design-builders, progressive design-builders, construction managers,
other contractors and design professionals, including engineers and
architects, and other appropriate professionals during the development of
the rules and regulations.
(4) A request for proposals for a project utilizing a public-private
partnership shall include at a minimum:
(a) The parameters of the proposed public-private partnership
agreement;
(b) The duties and responsibilities to be performed by the private
partner or private partners;
(c) The methods of oversight to be employed by the department;
(d) The duties and responsibilities that are to be performed by the
-15-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
department and any other parties to the contract;
(e) The evaluation factors and the relative weight of each factor to
be used in the scoring of awards;
(f) Plans for financing and operating the project and the revenue,
service payments, bond financings, and appropriations of public funds
needed for the qualifying project;
(g) Comprehensive documentation of the experience, capabilities,
capitalization and financial condition, and other relevant qualifications
of the private entity submitting the proposal;
(h) The ability of a private partner or private partners to quickly
respond to the needs presented in the request for proposals and the
importance of economic development opportunities represented by the
project. In evaluating proposals, preference shall be given to a plan
that includes the involvement of small businesses as subcontractors, to
the extent that small businesses can provide services in a competitive
manner, unless any preference interferes with the qualification for
federal or other funds; and
(i) Other information required by the department to evaluate the
proposals submitted and the overall proposed public-private partnership.
(5) A private entity desiring to be a private partner shall
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that it is capable of
performing any duty, responsibility, or function it may be authorized or
directed to perform as a term or condition of the public-private
partnership agreement.
(6) A request for proposals may be canceled, or all proposals may be
rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is taken in the
best interest of the State of Nebraska and approved by the purchasing
officer.
(7) Upon execution of a public-private partnership agreement, the
department shall ensure that the contract clearly identifies that a
public-private partnership is being utilized.
-16-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(8) The department shall:
(a) Adhere to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
under this section when utilizing a public-private partnership for
financing capital projects; and
(b) Electronically report annually to the Agriculture and Natural
Resources Committee of the Legislature regarding private-public
partnerships which have been considered or are approved pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 16. Section 66-2305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
66-2305 (1) The department shall create the Nuclear and Hydrogen
Industry Work Group.
(2) The work group shall consist of the following twelve members:
(a) One representative of the Nebraska community college system;
(b) One representative of the Nebraska state college system;
(c) Two representatives of the nuclear industry;
(d) Two representatives of the hydrogen industry;
(e) One representative of a public power district;
(f) Two at-large members;
(g) The Director of Economic Development or a designee of the
director;
(h) The chairperson of the Agriculture and Natural Resources
Committee of the Legislature or a designee of the chairperson; and
(i) The chairperson of the Government, Military and Veterans Affairs
Committee of the Legislature or a designee of the chairperson.
(3) The work group members described in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(f) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor. The work group
members described in subdivisions (2)(h) and (i) of this section shall
serve as ex officio, nonvoting members.
(4)(a) Each work group member described in subdivisions (2)(a)
through (f) of this section may receive a per diem of sixty dollars for
-17-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
each day such member attends a meeting of the work group or is engaged in
matters concerning the work group, except that no work group member shall
receive more than one thousand dollars in per diems per year under this
subdivision.
(b) Each such work group member shall be reimbursed for travel and
lodging expenses for the performance of such member's duties while
carrying out the Nuclear and Hydrogen Development Act as provided in
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 to be paid out of the Nuclear and Hydrogen
Development Fund.
Sec. 17. Section 70-1003, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1003 (1)(a) There is hereby established an independent board to
be known as the Nebraska Power Review Board. The board shall consist of
five members, including at least one engineer, at least one attorney, and
three additional persons. No more than one person who is or who has
within four years preceding such person's appointment been either a
director, an officer, or an employee of any electric utility or an
elective state officer shall serve on the board at the same time. Any
board member who previously was either a director, an officer, or an
employee of any electric utility within four years preceding such board
member's appointment shall refrain from taking any action or making any
decision in any proceeding before the board that involves such electric
utility for a period of four years after the date such board member
ceased being a director, an officer, or an employee of such electric
utility.
(b) Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor subject
to the approval of the Legislature. Upon expiration of the terms of the
members first appointed, the successors shall be appointed for terms of
four years. No member of the board shall serve more than three
consecutive terms. Any vacancy on the board arising other than from the
expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired
-18-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
portion of the term, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy on the
board shall be eligible for reappointment for two more consecutive terms.
No more than three members of the board shall be registered members of
that political party represented by the Governor.
(2) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars per
day for each day actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of
his or her duties, but not to exceed seven thousand dollars in any one
year, except for the member designated to represent the board on the
Southwest Power Pool Regional State Committee or its equivalent
successor, who shall receive two hundred fifty dollars for each day
actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of his or her duties,
not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars in any one year. If the member
designated to represent the board on the Southwest Power Pool Regional
State Committee should for any reason no longer serve in that capacity
during a year, the pay received while serving in such capacity shall not
be used for purposes of calculating the seven-thousand-dollar limitation
for board members not serving in that capacity. When another board member
acts as the proxy for the designated Southwest Power Pool Regional State
Committee member, he or she shall receive the same pay as the designated
member would have for that activity. Pay received while serving as proxy
for such designated member shall not be used for purposes of determining
whether the seven-thousand-dollar limitation has been met for board
members not serving as such designated member. Total pay to board members
for activities related to the Southwest Power Pool shall not exceed an
aggregate total of forty thousand dollars in any one year. Each member
shall be reimbursed for expenses while so engaged as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177. The board shall have jurisdiction as provided in
Chapter 70, article 10.
(3) The board shall elect from their members a chairperson and a
vice-chairperson. Decisions of the board shall require the approval of a
majority of the members of the board.
-19-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(4) The board shall employ an executive director and may employ such
other staff necessary to carry out the duties pursuant to Chapter 70,
article 10. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the
board and shall be solely responsible to the board. The executive
director shall be responsible for the administrative operations of the
board and shall perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned
to him or her by the board. The board may obtain the services of experts
and consultants necessary to carry out the board's duties pursuant to
Chapter 70, article 10.
(5) The board shall publish and submit a biennial report with annual
data to the Governor, with copies to be filed with the Clerk of the
Legislature and with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The department shall consider the information in the
Nebraska Power Review Board's report when the department prepares its own
reports pursuant to sections 81-1606 and 81-1607. The report of the board
shall include:
(a) The assessments for the fiscal year imposed pursuant to section
70-1020;
(b) The gross income totals for each category of the industry and
the industry total;
(c) The number of suppliers against whom the assessment is levied,
by category and in total;
(d) The projected dollar costs of generation, transmission, and
microwave applications, approved and denied;
(e) The actual dollar costs of approved applications upon
completion, and a summary of an informational hearing concerning any
significant divergence between the projected and actual costs;
(f) A description of Nebraska's current electric system and
information on additions to and retirements from the system during the
fiscal year, including microwave facilities;
-20-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(g) A statistical summary of board activities and an expenditure
summary;
(h) A roster of power suppliers in Nebraska and the assessment each
paid; and
(i) Appropriately detailed historical and projected electric supply
and demand statistics, including information on the total generating
capacity owned by Nebraska suppliers and the total peak load demand of
the previous year, along with an indication of how the industry will
respond to the projected situation.
(6) The board may, in its discretion, hold public hearings
concerning the conditions that may indicate that retail competition in
the electric industry would benefit Nebraska's citizens and what steps,
if any, should be taken to prepare for retail competition in Nebraska's
electricity market. In determining whether to hold such hearings, the
board shall consider the sufficiency of public interest.
(7) The board may, at any time deemed beneficial by the board,
submit a report to the Governor with copies to be filed with the Clerk of
the Legislature and the Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of
the Legislature. The report filed with the Clerk of the Legislature and
the committee shall be filed electronically. The report may include:
(a) Whether or not a viable regional transmission organization and
adequate transmission exist in Nebraska or in a region which includes
Nebraska;
(b) Whether or not a viable wholesale electricity market exists in a
region which includes Nebraska;
(c) To what extent retail rates have been unbundled in Nebraska;
(d) A comparison of Nebraska's wholesale electricity prices to the
prices in the region; and
(e) Any other information the board believes to be beneficial to the
Governor, the Legislature, and Nebraska's citizens when considering
whether retail electric competition would be beneficial, such as, but not
-21-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
limited to, an update on deregulation activities in other states and an
update on federal deregulation legislation.
(8) The board may establish working groups of interested parties to
assist the board in carrying out the powers set forth in subsections (6)
and (7) of this section.
Sec. 18. Section 72-2008, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-2008 The mission of the Niobrara Council is to assist in all
aspects of the management of the Niobrara scenic river corridor since
portions of the Niobrara River have been designated as a national scenic
river under 16 U.S.C. 1274(a)(117), as such section existed on May 24,
1991, giving consideration and respect to local and governmental input
and private landowner rights, and to maintain and protect the integrity
of the resources associated with the Niobrara scenic river corridor. The
council shall perform management functions related to the Niobrara scenic
river corridor, including, but not limited to, those authorized and
delegated to it by the National Park Service. The council may promulgate
its own rules and internal policies to carry out the purposes of the
Niobrara Scenic River Act. The Game and Parks Commission may provide
administrative, budgetary, operational, and programmatic support when
requested by the council to carry out its duties. In the Niobrara scenic
river corridor, the council may hold title to real estate in the name of
the council. The council may purchase, accept gifts of, or trade real
estate and may obtain conservation easements as provided in the
Conservation and Preservation Easements Act. Acquisition of conservation
easements outside the boundaries of the Niobrara scenic river corridor
shall require the approval of the appropriate governing body as provided
in section 76-2,112. On December 1, 2016, and on each December 1
thereafter, the council shall electronically submit an annual report to
the Clerk of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Agriculture and
Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature describing expenditures
-22-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
made pursuant to the Niobrara Scenic River Act.
Sec. 19. Section 81-15,327, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,327 (1) The department shall review and evaluate the studies
and assessments carried out by Illinois, Vermont, and Washington
regarding whether products or batteries that are not currently covered by
the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act should be covered at a
later date. The department may review similar studies or assessments
carried out by any other state or person.
(2) No later than May 30, 2028, the department shall electronically
submit a report to the Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee of the
Legislature. The report shall include the findings and recommendations of
any study or assessment reviewed by the department under this section.
The report may include recommendations for legislation based on the
department's evaluation of the studies and assessments reviewed by the
department.
Sec. 20. Section 81-1604, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1604 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Comprehensive planning enables the state to address its energy
needs, challenges, and opportunities and enhances the state's ability to
prioritize energy-related policies, activities, and programs; and
(b) Meeting the state's need for clean, affordable, and reliable
energy in the future will require a diverse energy portfolio and a
strategic approach, requiring engagement of all energy stakeholders in a
comprehensive planning process.
(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall develop
an integrated and comprehensive strategic state energy plan and review
such plan periodically as the department deems necessary. The department
may organize technical committees of individuals with expertise in energy
development for purposes of developing the plan. If the department forms
-23-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
an advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (58) of section 81-1504 for
purposes of such plan, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of
the Legislature, the chairperson of the Agriculture and Natural Resources
Committee of the Legislature, and three members of the Legislature
selected by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall be
nonvoting, ex officio members of such advisory committee.
(3) The strategic state energy plan shall include short-term and
long-term objectives that will ensure a secure, reliable, and resilient
energy system for the state's residents and businesses; a cost-
competitive energy supply and access to affordable energy; the promotion
of sustainable economic growth, job creation, and economic development;
and a means for the state's energy policy to adapt to changing
circumstances.
(4) The strategic state energy plan shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) A comprehensive analysis of the state's energy profile,
including all energy resources, end-use sectors, and supply and demand
projections;
(b) An analysis of other state energy plans and regional energy
activities which identifies opportunities for streamlining and
partnerships; and
(c) An identification of goals and recommendations related to:
(i) The diversification of the state's energy portfolio in a way
that balances the lowest practicable environmental cost with maximum
economic benefits;
(ii) The encouragement of state and local government coordination
and public-private partnerships for future economic and investment
decisions;
(iii) The incorporation of new technologies and opportunities for
energy diversification that will maximize Nebraska resources and support
local economic development;
-24-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(iv) The interstate and intrastate promotion and marketing of the
state's renewable energy resources;
(v) A consistent method of working with and marketing to energy-
related businesses and developers;
(vi) The advancement of transportation technologies, alternative
fuels, and infrastructure;
(vii) The development and enhancement of oil, natural gas, and
electricity production and distribution;
(viii) The development of a communications process between energy
utilities and the department for responding to and preparing for
regulations having a statewide impact; and
(ix) The development of a mechanism to measure the plan's progress.
Sec. 21. Section 84-120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-120 If the Lieutenant Governor or Speaker of the Legislature
becomes incapable of performing the duties of Governor as provided by
Article IV, section 16, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the duties of
Governor shall be performed in the following order: Chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, Chairperson of Committee on
Committees, Chairperson of Committee on Judiciary, Chairperson of
Committee on Government, Military and Veterans Affairs, Chairperson of
Committee on Appropriations, Chairperson of Committee on Revenue,
Chairperson of Committee on Education, Chairperson of Committee on
Banking, Commerce and Insurance, Chairperson of Committee on Agriculture
and Natural Resources, Chairperson of Committee on Agriculture,
Chairperson of Committee on Health and Human Services, Chairperson of
Committee on General Affairs, Chairperson of Committee on Urban Affairs,
Chairperson of Committee on Business and Labor, and Chairperson of
Committee on Transportation, and Chairperson of Committee on
Telecommunications and Technology, until the vacancy is filled.
Sec. 22. Section 86-331, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-25-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
amended to read:
86-331 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that all
federal, state, and local government funding for broadband infrastructure
and services in Nebraska be leveraged strategically to ensure that all
Nebraskans have access to affordable, reliable broadband services before
January 1, 2028. To accomplish this intent, the Nebraska Broadband Office
is created. The office shall be headed by the Director of Broadband. The
director shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor
with the approval of a majority of the Legislature. For administrative
and budgetary purposes, the Nebraska Broadband Office shall be located in
the Department of Transportation. All administrative and budgetary
decisions for the Nebraska Broadband Office shall be made by the Director
of Broadband.
(2) The Nebraska Broadband Office shall:
(a) Through active outreach, collaborate with officials at all
levels of government and with stakeholders, which may include, but not be
limited to, businesses and industries, community foundations, local
governments, local or regional economic development organizations,
schools, colleges, other educational entities, public libraries, health
care institutions, financial institutions, agricultural producers,
telecommunications providers, public power districts, electric
cooperatives, nonprofit organizations, and other interested entities;
(b) Through such collaboration, develop a strategic plan that
maximizes the use of public and private resources and encourages
innovative models for ownership of infrastructure that is used for both
private and public purposes;
(c) Direct the coordination among state agencies, boards, and
commissions on policy matters affecting use of federal or state funding
for broadband infrastructure deployment, operation, and maintenance;
(d) Conduct state advocacy on broadband issues at the federal level,
including the accuracy of federal mapping and speed data;
-26-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
(e) Ensure that all governmental funding is utilized in a cost-
effective and accountable manner for Nebraska broadband projects;
(f) Oversee the coordination of programs for broadband users, such
as libraries and schools, and digital equity and inclusion projects;
(g) Provide resources and assistance for local and regional
broadband planning; and
(h) Provide resources and information to the public through a
website and other communication modes.
(3) If any final decision of the Nebraska Broadband Office relating
to funding for broadband projects is appealed to district court, the
appeal shall take precedence on the trial docket over all other cases and
shall be assigned for hearing, trial, or argument at the earliest
practicable date and expedited in every way.
(4)(a) On or before December 1 of each year, the Nebraska Broadband
Office shall file with the Clerk of the Legislature an annual report on
the status of broadband within the State of Nebraska. The report shall:
(i) Describe the status of all publicly administered broadband
deployment programs, including the number of projects funded through
October of the report year;
(ii) Describe the quality of broadband service being provided to
Nebraska residents;
(iii) Provide any updates to the strategic plan developed under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section;
(iv) Summarize the Nebraska Broadband Office's outreach efforts and
collaboration with all interested stakeholders;
(v) Provide an update on efforts to promote digital equity and
inclusion on behalf of Nebraska residents; and
(vi) Provide an update on state advocacy on broadband issues being
conducted at the federal level.
(b) Upon receipt of such report, the Transportation and
Telecommunications and Technology Committee of the Legislature shall hold
-27-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
a public hearing to allow an opportunity for public comment on the
report.
Sec. 23. Section 86-333, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-333 (1) The Nebraska Broadband Office may create and maintain an
official Nebraska location fabric broadband access map showing broadband
availability and quality of service for all serviceable locations in
Nebraska utilizing any federal funding that is made available for such
purpose. For purposes of this section, serviceable location means any
residence, dwelling, business, or building where an entity provides or
may provide broadband services.
(2) The Nebraska Broadband Office may contract with private parties
to create, improve, and maintain the map. When contracting with private
parties, the office shall give preference to contractors providing
mapping services to the Federal Communications Commission. The office may
collect from providers of broadband services any information necessary to
establish and update the map. Any information provided to the office by a
provider of broadband services pursuant to this section that is
confidential, proprietary, or a trade secret as defined in section 87-502
shall be treated as such by the office.
(3) Any recipient of support from the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund shall comply with the provisions of this section.
Any grant recipient under the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act, including
any entity that operates as an eligible telecommunications carrier in
Nebraska as defined in section 86-1302 that wishes to participate in the
Broadband Bridge Program created under section 86-1303, either directly
or as a challenging party under section 86-1307, shall comply with the
provisions of this section. Any grant recipient of federal broadband
funding administered by the Nebraska Broadband Office shall comply with
the provisions of this section.
(4) After the Federal Communications Commission completes the
-28-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
national Broadband Serviceable Location Fabric and accompanying National
Broadband Availability Map, the Nebraska Broadband Office shall annually
evaluate whether the continued maintenance of any annually updated
Nebraska location fabric broadband access map created and maintained in
accordance with this section is necessary. The office shall report its
annual findings pursuant to this subsection to the Transportation and
Telecommunications and Technology Committee of the Legislature.
(5) The Nebraska Broadband Office shall utilize funding provided by
the federal Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program authorized
under the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law
117-58, to carry out this section.
Sec. 24. Section 86-515, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-515 (1) The Nebraska Information Technology Commission is
created. The commission shall consist of (a) one member representing
elementary and secondary education, (b) one member representing
postsecondary education, (c) the Governor or his or her designee, (d) one
member representing communities, and (e) five members representing the
general public who have experience in developing strategic plans and
making high-level business decisions. Of the members representing the
general public, the principal business or occupation of at least one such
member shall be agriculture. A member of the Transportation and
Telecommunications and Technology Committee of the Legislature shall be
appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council to serve as
an ex officio, nonvoting member of the commission. The Executive Board
shall make the initial appointment of such member after January 5, 2011,
and shall appoint a member every two years after the initial appointment.
At any time that there is not a member of the Educational Service Unit
Coordinating Council serving on the Nebraska Information Technology
Commission, the technical panel established pursuant to section 86-521,
or any working groups established pursuant to sections 86-512 to 86-524
-29-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
that establish, coordinate, or prioritize needs for education, the
Governor shall appoint to the commission one member who serves on the
Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council.
(2) The Governor or a designee of the Governor shall serve as
chairperson of the commission.
(3) The members of the commission other than the legislative member
shall be appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the
Legislature. Members of the commission shall serve for terms of four
years, except that two members initially appointed to represent the
general public shall be appointed for a term of two years and any member
appointed to represent the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council
shall be appointed for a term of one year. Members shall be limited to
two consecutive terms. The Governor or his or her designee shall serve on
the commission for his or her term. The legislative member of the
commission shall serve until he or she is reappointed or a successor is
appointed. Each member shall serve until the appointment and
qualification of his or her successor. In case of a vacancy occurring
prior to the expiration of the term of a member, the appointment shall be
made only for the remainder of the term.
(4) Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177.
(5) The commission may employ or designate an executive director to
provide administrative and operational support for the commission. The
Department of Administrative Services and Nebraska Educational
Telecommunications Commission shall assist with administrative and
operational support for the Nebraska Information Technology Commission as
necessary to carry out its duties.
Sec. 25. Section 86-524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-524 (1) The Appropriations Committee and the Telecommunications
and Technology Transportation Committee of the Legislature shall jointly
-30-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
review sections 86-512 to 86-524 before January 1, 2001, and every two
years thereafter. The Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall
designate staff with appropriate technical experience to provide the
staff support for the review. The committees shall establish criteria to
be used for the review in accordance with the following policy
objectives. It shall be the policy of the state to:
(a) Use information technology in education, communities, including
health care and economic development, and every level of government
service to improve economic opportunities and quality of life for all
Nebraskans regardless of location or income;
(b) Stimulate the demand to encourage and enable long-term
infrastructure innovation and improvement; and
(c) Organize technology planning in new ways to aggregate demand,
reduce costs, and create support networks; encourage collaboration
between communities of interest; and encourage competition among
technology and service providers.
(2) In the review, the committees shall determine the extent to
which:
(a) The vision has been realized and short-term and long-term
strategies have been articulated and employed;
(b) The statewide technology plan and other activities of the
commission have improved coordination and assisted policymakers;
(c) An information technology clearinghouse has been established,
maintained, and utilized of Nebraska's information technology
infrastructure and of activities taking place in the state involving
information technology, and the information flow between and among
individuals and organizations has been facilitated as a result of the
information technology clearinghouse;
(d) Policies, standards, guidelines, and architectures have been
developed and observed;
(e) Recommendations made by the commission to the Governor and
-31-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
Legislature have assisted policy and funding decisions;
(f) Input and involvement of all interested parties has been
encouraged and facilitated; and
(g) Long-term infrastructure innovation, improvement, and
coordination has been planned for, facilitated, and achieved with minimal
barriers and impediments.
Sec. 26. Section 86-1068, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
86-1068 (1) For purposes of this section, originating service
provider means the telecommunications service provider, whether by
wireline or wireless service, or the voice over Internet protocol service
provider providing the capability for customers to originate 911 calls.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(c) of this section, or
unless otherwise required by the Federal Communications Commission, no
later than January 1, 2026, an originating service provider and the next-
generation 911 service contractor shall cause:
(i) All 911 calls to be transmitted to the next-generation 911
network that allows 911 calls to be answered; and
(ii) All translation and routing to be completed to deliver all 911
calls, including associated location information in the requested
Internet protocol-enabled service format, to the next-generation 911
network that allows 911 calls to be answered.
(b) No later than ten months prior to the date set forth in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, an originating service provider and
the next-generation 911 service contractor shall enter into an agreement
to cause the requirements of such subdivision to be met. If the
originating service provider and the next-generation 911 service
contractor have not entered into an agreement by such date, the
originating service provider and the next-generation 911 service
contractor shall notify the Public Service Commission to seek resolution
of any unresolved issues in accordance with the commission's policies
-32-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
relating to interconnection arbitration and mediation.
(c) An originating service provider may enter into an agreement with
the commission to establish an alternative timeframe for meeting the
requirements of subdivision (2)(a) of this section. The originating
service provider shall notify the commission of the dates and terms of
the alternative timeframe within thirty days after entering into such
agreement.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, or
unless otherwise required by the Federal Communications Commission, no
later than January 1, 2026, a provider of telecommunications relay
services and the next-generation 911 service contractor shall cause:
(i) All 911 calls to be transmitted to the next-generation 911
network that allows 911 calls to be answered; and
(ii) All translation and routing to be completed to deliver all 911
calls, including associated location information if received from the
originating service provider in the requested Internet protocol-enabled
service format, to the next-generation 911 network that allows 911 calls
to be answered.
(b) No later than ten months prior to the date set forth in
subdivision (3)(a) of this section, a provider of telecommunications
relay services and the next-generation 911 service contractor shall enter
into an agreement to cause the requirements of such subdivision to be
met. If the provider of telecommunications relay services and the next-
generation 911 service contractor have not entered into an agreement by
such date, the provider of telecommunications relay services and the
next-generation 911 service contractor shall notify the Public Service
Commission to seek resolution of any unresolved issues in accordance with
the commission's policies relating to interconnection arbitration and
mediation.
(c) A provider of telecommunications relay services may enter into
an agreement with the commission to establish an alternative timeframe
-33-

LB1179 LB1179
2026 2026
for meeting the requirements of subdivision (3)(a) of this section. The
telecommunications relay provider shall notify the commission of the
dates and terms of the alternative timeframe within thirty days after
entering into such agreement.
(4) No later than November 15, 2024, and no later than November 15
of each year thereafter, the next-generation 911 service contractor shall
submit an annual report electronically to the Transportation and
Telecommunications and Technology Committee of the Legislature and to the
commission on the capabilities and redundancies of the next-generation
911 service network.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify or change
any requirement for an originating service provider to file a report with
state and federal entities, including with public safety answering points
and local governing bodies, in accordance with applicable local, state,
or federal regulations and policies, regarding any impediment to
transmitting and delivering 911 calls to the next-generation 911 network.
Sec. 27. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 28. Original sections 2-409, 2-3226.01, 2-3414, 37-431,
37-1406, 46-1305, 50-447, 50-448, 54-642, 72-2008, 84-120, 86-331,
86-333, 86-515, and 86-524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
sections 2-3615, 39-2825, and 66-2305, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 46-1304, 50-1601, 61-227, 61-520, 70-1003,
81-15,327, 81-1604, and 86-1068, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-34-